Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 12.1 Uniform Partnership Act [Effective January 1, 2023.]
7-12.1-901.
Statement of qualification. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership may become a limited liability partnership pursuant to this section.

The terms and conditions on which a partnership becomes a limited liability partnership must be approved by the affirmative vote or consent necessary to amend the partnership agreement except, in the case of a partnership agreement that expressly addresses obligations to contribute to the partnership, the affirmative vote or consent necessary to amend those provisions.

After the approval required by subsection (b) of this section, a partnership may become a limited liability partnership by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of qualification. The statement must contain:

The name of the partnership which must comply with §

7-12.1-902

;

The street and mailing addresses of the partnership’s principal office and, if different, the street address of an office in this state, if any;

The name and street and mailing addresses in this state of the partnership’s registered agent; and

A statement that the partnership elects to become a limited liability partnership.

A partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership remains effective, regardless of changes in the partnership, until it is canceled pursuant to subsection (f) of this section or administratively revoked pursuant to §

7-12.1-903

.

The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership and the protection against liability of its partners for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the partnership while it is a limited liability partnership is not affected by errors or later changes in the information required to be contained in the statement of qualification.

A limited liability partnership may amend or cancel its statement of qualification by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of amendment or cancellation. The statement must be approved by the affirmative vote or consent of all the partners and state the name of the limited liability partnership and in the case of:

An amendment, state the text of the amendment; and

A cancellation, state that the statement of qualification is canceled.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-902.
Permitted names. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The name of a partnership that is not a limited liability partnership may not contain the phrase “Registered Limited Liability Partnership” or “Limited Liability Partnership” or the abbreviation “R.L.L.P.”, “L.L.P.”, “RLLP”, or “LLP”.

The name of a limited liability partnership must contain the phrase “Registered Limited Liability Partnership” or “Limited Liability Partnership” or the abbreviation “R.L.L.P.”, “L.L.P.”, “RLLP”, or “LLP”.

The name of a limited liability partnership, and the name under which a foreign limited liability partnership may register to do business in this state, must be distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from any:

Name of an existing person whose formation or qualifications required the filing of a record by the secretary of state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of an existing person the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-902.1.
Fictitious business name. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Any domestic or foreign limited liability partnership formed under the laws of, or registered to do business in this state may transact business in this state under a fictitious name provided that it files a fictitious business name statement in accordance with this section prior to the time it commences to conduct business under the fictitious name.

A fictitious business name statement shall be filed with the secretary of state, and shall be signed by a person authorized or required under this chapter to sign a record, and shall state:

The fictitious business name to be used; and

The name of the applicant limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, and the state and date of its formation.

The fictitious business name statement expires upon the filing of a statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name registered in accordance with this section or upon the cancellation of the domestic limited liability partnership or the withdrawal of registration of the foreign limited liability partnership.

The statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name under this section shall be filed with the secretary of state, shall be executed in the same manner provided in subsection (b) of this section, and shall state:

The fictitious business name being abandoned;

The date on which the original fictitious business name statement being abandoned was filed; and

The information presented in subsection (b) of this section.

No domestic or foreign limited liability partnership transacting business under a fictitious business name contrary to the provisions of this section, or its assignee, may maintain any action upon or on account of any contract made, or transaction had, in the fictitious business name in any court of the state until a fictitious business name statement has been filed in accordance with this section.

No domestic or foreign limited liability partnership may be permitted to transact business under a fictitious business name pursuant to this section that is the same as the name of an existing person whose registration or qualification required the filing of a record by the secretary of state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of an existing person the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-903.
Administrative revocation of statement of qualification. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The statement of qualification of a limited liability partnership may be revoked by the secretary of state under the conditions prescribed in this section when it is established that:

The limited liability partnership procured its statement of qualification through fraud;

The limited liability partnership has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

The limited liability partnership has failed to file its annual report within the time required by this chapter;

The limited liability partnership has failed to pay any required fees to the secretary of state when they have become due and payable;

The secretary of state has received notice from the division of taxation, in accordance with §

7-12.1-915

, that the limited liability partnership has failed to pay any fees or taxes due this state;

The limited liability partnership has failed for thirty (30) days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state as required by this chapter;

The limited liability partnership has failed, after change of its registered agent, to file in the office of the secretary of state a statement of the change as required by this chapter;

The limited liability partnership has failed to file in the office of the secretary of state any amendment to its statement of qualification or any articles of dissolution, cancellation statement, merger, or consolidation as prescribed by this chapter; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted by the limited liability partnership pursuant to this chapter.

No certificate of a limited liability partnership shall be revoked by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state shall have given the limited liability partnership notice thereof not less than sixty (60) days prior to such revocation by regular mail addressed to the registered agent in this state on file with the secretary of state’s office, which notice shall specify the basis for the revocation; provided, however, that if a prior mailing addressed to the address of the registered agent of the limited liability partnership in this state currently on file with the secretary of state’s office has been returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, or if the revocation notice is returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, the secretary of state shall give notice as follows:

To the limited liability partnership at its principal office of record as shown in its most recent annual report, and no further notice shall be required; or

In the case of a limited liability partnership that has not yet filed an annual report, then to the limited liability partnership at the principal office in the statement of qualification of limited liability partnership and no further notice shall be required; and

The limited liability partnership fails prior to revocation to file the annual report, pay the fees or taxes, file the required statement of change of registered agent, file any amendments to its statement of qualification or articles of dissolution, cancellation statement, merger, or consolidation, or correct the misrepresentation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-903.1.
Issuance of certificates of revocation. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Upon revoking any such certificate of a limited liability partnership, the secretary of state shall:

Issue a certificate of revocation in duplicate;

File one of the certificates in the secretary of state’s office;

Send to the limited liability partnership by regular mail a certificate of revocation, addressed to the registered agent of the limited liability partnership in this state on file with the secretary of state’s office; provided, however, that if a prior mailing addressed to the address of the registered agent of the limited liability partnership in this state currently on file with the secretary of state’s office has been returned to the secretary of state as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, or if the revocation certificate is returned as undeliverable to the secretary of state’s office by the United States Postal Service for any reason, the secretary of state shall give notice as follows:

To the limited liability partnership at its principal office of record as shown in its most recent annual report, and no further notice shall be required; or

In the case of a limited liability partnership that has not yet filed an annual report, then to the domestic limited liability company at the principal office in the articles of organization or to the authorized person listed on the articles of organization, and no further notice shall be required.

An administrative revocation under this section affects only the partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership and is not an event causing dissolution of the partnership.

The revocation of a limited liability partnership does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-904.
Reinstatement. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership whose statement of qualification has been revoked administratively under §

7-12.1-903

may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement of the statement of qualification not later than two (2) years after the effective date of the revocation. The application must be accompanied by a certificate of good standing from the Rhode Island division of taxation and state:

The name of the partnership at the time of the administrative revocation of its statement of qualification and, if needed, a different name that satisfies §

7-12.1-902

;

The address of the principal office of the partnership and the name and street and mailing addresses of its registered agent;

The effective date of administrative revocation of the partnership’s statement of qualification;

On the payment by the limited liability partnership of a penalty in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each year or part of year that has elapsed since the issuance of the certificate of revocation; and

That the grounds for revocation did not exist or have been cured.

To have its statement of qualification reinstated, a partnership must pay all fees, taxes, interest, and penalties that were due to the secretary of state or tax administrator at the time of the administrative revocation and all fees, taxes, interest, and penalties that would have been due to the secretary of state or tax administrator while the partnership’s statement of qualification was revoked administratively.

If the secretary of state determines that an application under subsection (a) of this section contains the required information, is satisfied that the information is correct, and determines that all payments required to be made to the secretary of state by subsection (b) of this section have been made, the secretary of state shall:

Cancel the statement of revocation and prepare a statement of reinstatement that states the secretary of state’s determination and the effective date of reinstatement; and

File the statement of reinstatement and serve a copy on the partnership.

When reinstatement under this section has become effective, the following rules apply:

The reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative revocation.

The partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership continues as if the revocation had not occurred.

The rights of a person arising out of an act or omission in reliance on the revocation before the person knew or had notice of the reinstatement are not affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-905.
Judicial review of denial of reinstatement. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If the secretary of state denies a partnership’s application for reinstatement following administrative revocation of the partnership’s statement of qualification, the secretary of state shall serve the partnership with a notice in a record that explains the reasons for the denial.

A partnership may seek judicial review of denial of reinstatement in the Providence County superior court not later than thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-906.
Reservation of name. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a name that complies with §

7-12.1-902

by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must state the name and address of the applicant and the name to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the name is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for one hundred twenty (120) days.

The owner of a reserved name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a signed notice in a record of the transfer which states the name and address of the person to which the reservation is being transferred.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-907.
Registration of name. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A foreign limited liability partnership not registered to do business in this state under Article 10 of this chapter may register its name, or an alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-12.1-902

, if the name is distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from the names that are not available under §

7-12.1-902

.

To register its name or an alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-12.1-902

, a foreign limited liability partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an application stating the partnership’s name, the jurisdiction and date of its formation, and any alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-12.1-902

. If the secretary of state finds that the name applied for is available, the secretary of state shall register the name for the applicant’s exclusive use.

The registration of a name under this section is effective for one year after the date of registration.

A foreign limited liability partnership whose name registration is effective may renew the registration for successive one-year periods by delivering, not earlier than three (3) months before the expiration of the registration, to the secretary of state for filing a renewal application that complies with this section. When filed, the renewal application renews the registration for a succeeding one-year period.

A foreign limited liability partnership whose name registration is effective may register as a foreign limited liability partnership under the registered name or consent in a signed record to the use of that name by another person that is not an individual.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-908.
Registered agent. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Each limited liability partnership and each registered foreign limited liability partnership shall designate and maintain a registered agent in this state. The designation of a registered agent is an affirmation of fact by the partnership or foreign partnership that the agent has consented to serve.

A registered agent for a limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership must be an existing person and have a place of business in this state.

The only duties under this chapter of a registered agent that has complied with this chapter are:

To forward to the limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the partnership or foreign partnership any process, notice, or demand pertaining to the partnership or foreign partnership which is served on or received by the agent;

If the registered agent resigns, to provide the notice required by §

7-12.1-907(c)

to the partnership or foreign partnership at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the partnership or foreign partnership; and

To keep current the information with respect to the agent in the statement of qualification or foreign registration statement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-909.
Change of registered agent or address for registered agent by limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership may change its registered agent or the address of its registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that states:

The name of the partnership or foreign partnership; and

The information that is to be in effect as a result of the filing of the statement of change.

The partners of a limited liability partnership need not approve the delivery to the secretary of state for filing of:

A statement of change under this section; or

A similar filing changing the registered agent or registered office, if any, of the partnership in any other jurisdiction.

A statement of change under this section designating a new registered agent is an affirmation of fact by the limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership that the agent has consented to serve.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-910.
Resignation of registered agent. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A registered agent may resign as an agent for a limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation that states:

The name of the partnership or foreign partnership;

The name of the agent;

That the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the partnership or foreign partnership; and

The address of the partnership or foreign partnership to which the agent will send the notice required by subsection (c) of this section.

A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of:

The thirty-first day after the day on which it is filed by the secretary of state; or

The designation of a new registered agent for the limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership.

A registered agent promptly shall furnish to the limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership notice in a record of the date on which a statement of resignation was filed.

When a statement of resignation takes effect, the registered agent ceases to have responsibility under this chapter for any matter thereafter tendered to it as agent for the limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership. The resignation does not affect any contractual rights the partnership or foreign partnership has against the agent or that the agent has against the partnership or foreign partnership.

A registered agent may resign with respect to a limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership whether or not the partnership or foreign partnership is in good standing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-911.
Change of name or address by registered agent. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a registered agent changes its name or address, the agent may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that states:

The name of the limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership represented by the registered agent;

The name of the agent as currently shown in the records of the secretary of state for the partnership or foreign partnership;

If the name of the agent has changed, its new name; and

If the address of the agent has changed, its new address.

A registered agent promptly shall furnish notice to the represented limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership of the filing by the secretary of state of the statement of change and the changes made by the statement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-912.
Service of process, notice, or demand. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership may be served with any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law by serving its registered agent.

If a limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the secretary of state is an agent of the corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the secretary of state of any process, notice, or demand is made by delivering to and leaving with him or her or with any clerk having charge of the corporation department of his or her office, duplicate copies of the process, notice, or demand. In the event any process, notice, or demand is served on the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall immediately forward one of the copies by certified mail, addressed to the corporation at its registered office. Any service upon the secretary of state is returnable in not less than thirty (30) days.

The secretary of state shall maintain a record of any such service setting forth the name of the plaintiff and defendant, the title, docket number and nature of the proceeding in which process has been served upon the secretary of state, the fact that service has been effected pursuant to this subsection, the return date thereof, and the day and hour when the service was made. The secretary of state shall not be required to retain such information for a period longer than five (5) years from receipt of the service of process.

Service of process, notice, or demand on a registered agent must be in a written record.

Service of process, notice, or demand may be made by other means under law other than this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-913.
Annual report for secretary of state. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an annual report that states:

The name of the partnership or registered foreign partnership;

The street and mailing addresses of its principal office;

The name of at least one partner;

In the case of a foreign partnership, its jurisdiction of formation and any alternate name adopted under §

7-12.1-1006

;

A brief statement of the character of the business in which the limited liability partnership is actually engaged in this state; and

Any additional information that is required by the secretary of state.

The annual report must be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the secretary of state, and the information in the annual report must be current as of the date the report is signed by the limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership.

The first annual report must be filed with the secretary of state after February 1, and before May 1, of the year following the calendar year in which the limited liability partnership’s statement of qualification became effective or the registered foreign limited liability partnership registered to do business in this state. Subsequent annual reports must be filed with the secretary of state after February 1, and before May 1, of each calendar year thereafter. Proof to the satisfaction of the secretary of state that prior to May 1 the report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed, with postage prepaid, is deemed to be a compliance with this requirement.

If the secretary of state finds that the annual report conforms to the requirements of this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the report. If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the secretary of state promptly shall notify the reporting limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership in a record and return the report for correction, in which event the penalties subsequently prescribed for failure to file the report within the time previously provided do not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this chapter and returned to the secretary of state within thirty (30) days from the date on which it was mailed to the corporation by the secretary of state.

Each limited liability partnership, domestic or foreign, that fails or refuses to file its annual report for any year within thirty (30) days after the time prescribed by this chapter is subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-914.
Filing of returns with the tax administrator — Annual charge. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2012, a limited liability partnership registered under §

7-12-56

shall file a return in the form and containing the information as prescribed by the tax administrator as follows:

If the fiscal year of the limited liability partnership is the calendar year, on or before the fifteenth day of April in the year following the close of the fiscal year; and

If the fiscal year of the limited liability partnership is not a calendar year, on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year.

For tax years beginning after December 31, 2015, a limited liability partnership registered under §

7-12-56

or this chapter, shall file a return, in the form and containing the information as prescribed by the tax administrator, and shall be filed on or before the date a federal tax return is due to be filed, without regard to extension.

An annual charge, equal to the minimum tax imposed upon a corporation under §

44-11-2(e)

, shall be due on the filing of the limited liability partnership’s return filed with the tax administrator and shall be paid to the division of taxation.

The annual charge is delinquent if not paid by the due date for the filing of the return and an addition of one hundred dollars ($100) to the charge is then due.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-915.
Confirmation of state fees and taxes. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Rhode Island general laws, when any section of this chapter refers to state fees and/or taxes paid, the division of taxation is authorized to respond and share tax information with the secretary of state’s office in response to a request from that office regarding an entity’s tax status as compliant or noncompliant.

If the secretary of state’s office receives notice from the division of taxation that the limited liability partnership has failed to pay any fees or taxes due this state, the secretary of state shall begin revocation proceedings in accordance with the provisions of §

7-12.1-903

.

The notice of revocation may state as the basis for revocation that the taxpayer failed to pay state fees and/or taxes to the division of taxation. However, the secretary of state’s office must otherwise protect all state and federal tax information in its custody as required by §

7-12.1-916

and refrain from disclosing any other specific tax information.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-916.
Revocation of certificate of limited liability partnership or certificate of registration for nonpayment of fees or taxes. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The tax administrator may, after July 15 of each year, compile a list of all limited liability partnerships that have failed to pay any state fees and/or taxes for one year after the fees and/or taxes became due and payable, and the failure is not the subject of a pending appeal. The tax administrator shall certify to the correctness of the list. Upon receipt of the certified list, the secretary of state may initiate revocation proceedings as defined in §

7-12.1-903

.

With respect to any information provided by the division of taxation to the secretary of state’s office pursuant to this chapter, the secretary of state, together with the employees or agents thereof, shall be subject to all state and federal tax confidentiality laws applying to the division of taxation and the officers, agents, and employees thereof, and which restrict the acquisition, use, storage, dissemination, or publication of confidential taxpayer data.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the notice of revocation may state as the basis for revocation that the taxpayer has failed to pay state fees and/or taxes to the division of taxation. However, the secretary of state’s office must otherwise protect all state and federal tax information in its custody as required by subsection (b) of this section and refrain from disclosing any other specific tax information.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

Article 10 Foreign Limited Liability Partnership [Effective January 1, 2023.]

7-12.1-1001.
Governing law. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The law of the jurisdiction of formation of a foreign limited liability partnership governs:

The internal affairs of the partnership; and

The liability of a partner as partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the foreign partnership.

A foreign limited liability partnership is not precluded from registering to do business in this state because of any difference between the law of its jurisdiction of formation and the law of this state.

Registration of a foreign limited liability partnership to do business in this state does not authorize the foreign partnership to engage in any business or exercise any power that a limited liability partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1002.
Registration to do business in this state. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A foreign limited liability partnership may not do business in this state until it registers with the secretary of state under this article.

A foreign limited liability partnership doing business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has registered to do business in this state.

The failure of a foreign limited liability partnership to register to do business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign partnership or preclude it from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

A limitation on the liability of a partner of a foreign limited liability partnership is not waived solely because the foreign partnership does business in this state without registering to do business in this state.

Section

7-12.1-1001(a)

and (b) applies even if a foreign limited liability partnership fails to register under this article.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1003.
Foreign registration statement. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

To register to do business in this state, a foreign limited liability partnership must deliver a foreign registration statement to the secretary of state for filing. The statement must state:

The name of the partnership and, if the name does not comply with §

7-12.1-902

, an alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-12.1-1006(a)

;

That the partnership is a foreign limited liability partnership;

The partnership’s jurisdiction of formation;

The general character of the business it proposes to transact in this state;

The name and business address of at least one partner;

The street and mailing addresses of the partnership’s principal office and, if the law of the partnership’s jurisdiction of formation requires the partnership to maintain an office in that jurisdiction, the street and mailing addresses of the required office;

The name and street and mailing addresses of the partnership’s registered agent in this state;

A statement that the secretary of state is appointed the agent of a foreign limited liability partnership for service of process if no agent has been appointed, or, if appointed, the agent’s authority has been revoked or if the agent cannot be found or served with the exercise of reasonable diligence; and

Additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the secretary of state to determine whether the foreign limited liability partnership is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1004.
Amendment of foreign registration statement. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A registered foreign limited liability partnership shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment to its foreign registration statement if there is a change in:

The name of the partnership;

The alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-12.1-1006(a)

;

The address required by §

7-12.1-1003(6)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.